Massachusetts, session 194th, S605.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 21 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding, after section
67, the following section:-
Section 68. The Massachusetts Department of Environmental Protection shall establish a
competitive grant program to provide funding to Massachusetts small businesses for the
transition to a circular economy. Circular economy is defined as an economy that keeps material,
products, and services in circulation for as long as possible. The department shall promulgate
regulations to support the creation of the program. The department shall be authorized to accept
applications from businesses that are incorporated in, are properly licensed to do business in, or
have a location in Massachusetts. All grants made under this program should provide a
measurable economic benefit to Massachusetts.
of 3

The department shall evaluate a list of criteria in awarding grant applications. The
Department shall prioritize applications that fall under any of the following categories:
applications that are from (i) certified minority-owned and women-owned business enterprises;
(ii) businesses that are geographically located within an environmental justice population; and
(iii) businesses that provide substantial benefit to environmental justice populations, as long as
these applications meet all other necessary criteria. Environmental justice populations are
defined in section 56 of chapter 8. The department is authorized to use its discretion to decide
between applications of similar standing.
SECTION 2. Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding, after
section 28, the following section:-
Section 29. The Secretary of Energy and Environmental Affairs shall establish a grant
program to provide funding to Massachusetts nonprofits, academic institutions, and businesses to
conduct scientific research and the research and development of new technology created for the
purpose of improving ocean health and the responsible use of the ocean. This funding may be
used for scientific studies and other research, research and development of new technology,
investment into existing beneficial technology, expansion of existing beneficial technology, or
research into how the technology affects the Commonwealth, the state economy, or particular
industries. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to support the creation of a
grant program. The department shall accept applications from entities that are incorporated in,
are properly licensed to do business in, or have a location in Massachusetts. All grants made
under this program should provide a measurable economic benefit to the Massachusetts ocean
economy.
of 3

In awarding grant funding, the Secretary shall prioritize projects with the most
measurable benefit to the ocean environment, marine species, or coastal communities; projects
using existing technology that is identified as the best available prototype in the field; projects
with outcomes that promote equity and inclusivity; projects that promote the use of time-series
data. Applications that satisfy one or more of these criteria shall be considered favorably in
priority of awards for funding, so long as those applications meet all other necessary criteria. The
Secretary is authorized to use discretion to decide between applications of similar standing.
SECTION 3. Chapter 69 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by adding, after section
1T, the following section:-
Section 1U. There shall be within the Massachusetts Department of Elementary and
Secondary Education a Blue Economy Education Fund to be used to provide funding to the
Commonwealth’s high schools to expand educational development, workforce training, and job
placement programs in blue-STEAM industries. Blue-STEAM industries are defined as ocean
sector jobs in science, technology, engineering, art, and mathematics.
The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall create an application
process for interested high schools to apply to the Blue Economy Education Fund. All funding
shall be prioritized to applications by high schools located within an environmental justice
community or composed of a substantial number of students from environmental justice
communities, as defined in section 62 of chapter 30 as amended by Chapter 8 of the Acts of
2021.
of 3